Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4786.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 501b. (1) The Upper Peninsula natural resources commission is created. The Upper Peninsula natural resources commission is composed of the following members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate: (a) One individual from a list submitted by each member of the house of representatives whose district boundaries include the Upper Peninsula. (b) Two individuals from a list submitted by each member of the senate whose district boundaries include the Upper Peninsula. (c) Two individuals from a list submitted jointly by all of the individuals described in subdivisions (a) and (b). (2) The term of office of each member of the Upper Peninsula natural resources commission is 2 years. If a vacancy occurs on the Upper Peninsula natural resources commission, the governor shall make an appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. Each member of the Upper Peninsula natural resources commission holds office until the appointment and qualification of that member's successor. Not more than half of the commission members may be members of the same political party. (3) Members of the Upper Peninsula natural resources commission shall serve without compensation. However, members of the Upper Peninsula natural resources commission may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the official duties as members of the Upper Peninsula natural resources commission. (4) The Upper Peninsula natural resources commission has all of the following powers: (a) The authority to issue orders or promulgate rules regarding the taking of game or sport fish that have an impact only on the Upper Peninsula or that have no significant impact outside the Upper Peninsula. (b) Any other powers provided by law. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4785 (request no. H00575'25). (b) House Bill No. 4784 (request no. H00576'25). (c) House Bill No. 4783 (request no. H00578'25).